Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 1. Programs and Courses of Instruction Generally.
§ 22.1-212.1:2.
Green schools program; education programs to promote waste reduction and resource efficiency.

To assist local school boards in the development and implementation of programs of instruction that comply with the provisions of subsection C of § 22.1-253.13:1, specifically relating to citizenship and environmental issues and geography necessary for responsible participation in American society and the international community, the Board of Education may cooperate with environmental groups, other relevant state agencies, such as, but not limited to, the Department of Environmental Quality and the Department of Health, and other stakeholders in the development of a green schools program for Virginia. Any such green schools program shall focus on waste reduction through recycling and other mechanisms and educating students to help schools contain costs and to reduce waste production through resource efficiency.

In the development and implementation of any such program, the Board shall examine other states’ green schools programs and shall receive input from parents, teachers, school administrators, school boards, business and industry leaders, and local governments. The Board shall also strive to identify businesses and other organizations that may provide support in the form of resources or funding for appropriate awards for any green schools program that may be implemented in the Commonwealth.

Nothing herein shall be construed to require the Board or any school board in the Commonwealth to implement a green school program or to imply or otherwise indicate that state or local funding is required to develop or implement any green school program.

History.

2004, c. 882.

§ 22.1-212.2.
Virtual Virginia.

From such funds as are appropriated, the Department of Education shall establish a statewide electronic classroom to be known as the Virtual Virginia Program. Virtual Virginia shall be made available to every public high school in Virginia.

The Department may utilize the services of the Commonwealth’s educational television stations and other providers, as well as any other appropriate technology for the purposes of implementing Virtual Virginia.

The services of this program shall be limited to educational purposes. Educational purposes shall include, but not be limited to, instruction in subject areas that are not available in all schools and in-service training for instructional, administrative and support personnel.

The Department may contract with one or more local school boards that have created online courses to make one or more such courses available to other school divisions through the Virtual Virginia Program. The Department shall approve all courses offered through Virtual Virginia, including those made available by local school boards to other school divisions. A school board that makes one or more of its online courses available to other school divisions through Virtual Virginia (i) shall not be considered a multidivision online provider pursuant to § 22.1-212.23 and (ii) may charge a per-course or per-student fee to school divisions to defray the costs of developing the course and providing course instruction using teachers employed by the offering school board. The Department shall approve any such fee schedule before a school board offers any such online courses through Virtual Virginia.

The Department shall establish the Virtual Learning Advisory Committee, which shall consist of one superintendent or his designee from each of the eight superintendent’s regions, the Superintendent of Public Instruction or his designee, and such other members as the Department deems appropriate, not to exceed three additional members. The contractor that manages Virtual Virginia shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member. The Committee shall advise the Department on (i) online courses, in-service training, and digital instructional resources that school divisions need to meet the Commonwealth’s graduation requirements and (ii) strategic planning to expand blended and online learning opportunities in Virginia’s public schools, including cost-effective access to high-need and low-demand courses, training, content, and digital resources.

History.

1988, c. 87; 1998, c. 106; 2011, c. 216; 2014, c. 436.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 216, in the first paragraph, substituted “Department of Education” for “Board of Education,” “statewide electronic classroom to be known as the Virtual Virginia Program” for “Statewide Electronic Classroom Program,” and “Virtual Virginia shall be made available” for “The Statewide Electronic Classroom Program shall be made available,” in the second paragraph, substituted “Department” for “Board,” “other providers” for “earth satellite stations,” and “Virtual Virginia” for “the Statewide Electronic Classroom Program,” and in the last paragraph, deleted “classroom” preceding “instruction” and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 436 in the first paragraph inserted “in Virginia”; in the third paragraph substituted “in-service” for “in service”; and added the fourth and fifth paragraphs.

Law Review.

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

§ 22.1-212.2:1.
Repealed by Acts 2001, c. 660, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For the current Virginia Teaching Scholarship Loan Program, see § 22.1-290.01.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-212.2:1, which established the Virginia Teaching Scholarship Loan Program, was enacted by Acts 1996, c. 198 and amended by Acts 1997, c. 899; 1999, c. 753; 2000, cc. 570, 597, 623, 645, 719.

§ 22.1-212.2:2.
Educational technology foundations and public school foundations.

As used in this section:“Educational technology” means any software, hardware, or other equipment or infrastructure or technical assistance or instruction in the use of such software, hardware or other equipment or infrastructure that may be required to implement a local school board’s approved plan for educational technology or the Board of Education’s comprehensive technology plan for Virginia described in § 22.1-253.13:6.“Educational technology foundation” means a nonstock, nonprofit corporation, established for the express purpose of implementing a public/private partnership to expand access to and improve the quality of educational technology in a school division.“Public school foundation” means a nonstock, nonprofit corporation, established for the express purpose of implementing a public/private partnership to implement public school improvement projects approved by the local school board.“Public school improvement project” means any project designed to achieve an educational purpose that may be identified in Title 22.1.

Any school board may establish educational technology and public school foundations. Such foundations may be established directly by the school board or by the school board and other organizations or persons, on behalf of the school board by a third party, or through a contract with a corporation as defined in this section. Such foundations may be established as a cooperative regional effort by two or more school boards.

Upon establishing or contracting with such nonstock, nonprofit corporation, whether or not other organizations, school boards or persons are involved, a school board shall:

Review and approve the articles of incorporation and bylaws;

Establish a system of accounting to protect public funds;

Establish agreement that, upon dissolution of such corporation, any assets remaining after payment of just debts shall be transferred to and become the property of the school board or, if a regional effort, the procedure by which the property may be divided among the school boards;

Require, in any instance in which the school board advances, contributes or loans funds to the corporation, that such contract shall provide for the posting of a bond with surety by the officers of such corporation conditioned to protect the rights of the school board;

Establish terms for the allocation of any profits or revenues between the school board and the corporation; and

Take such other steps as may be necessary to comply with applicable law.

A school board may (i) advance, contribute or loan funds to such foundations and (ii) establish an escrow fund for the purpose of funding various educational technology projects, in the case of an educational technology foundation, or public school improvement projects approved by the local school board, in the case of a public school foundation.

A school board that makes purchases through its public school foundation or purchases educational technology through its educational technology foundation, either as may be established pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the provisions of the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.), as provided in subdivision A 12 of §

2.2-4343

, except, relative to such purchases, the school board shall comply with the provisions of §

2.2-4311

and §§

2.2-4367

through

2.2-4377

.

History.

1997, c. 863; 1999, cc. 456, 735; 2005, cc. 331, 450; 2011, c. 216.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “subdivision A 12 of §

2.2-4343

” was substituted for “subsection E of §

2.2-4300

” in subsection E.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 456, in subsection A, inserted “the Family Involvement in Technology program pursuant to § 22.1-212.2:3” in the paragraph defining “Educational technology.”

The 1999 amendment by c. 735, in subsection A, added the paragraphs defining “Public school foundation,” and “Public school improvement project”; in subsection B, substituted “educational technology and public school foundations. Such foundations” for “an educational technology foundation. Such foundation,” and substituted “Such foundations” for “An educational technology foundation”; in subsection C, inserted “nonstock, nonprofit,” and substituted “such corporation” for “the corporation” in subdivisions C 3 and C 4; in subsection D, substituted “foundations” for “foundation,” and added “in the case of an educational technology foundation, or public school improvement projects approved by the local school board, in the case of a public school foundation” at the end of the subsection; and added subsection E.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 331 and 450 are nearly identical, and substituted “comprehensive technology plan for Virginia described in § 22.1-253.13:6” for “Six-Year Plan for Educational Technology” in the definition of “Educational technology” in subsection A; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 216, in the definition for “Educational technology,” deleted “the Family Involvement in Technology program pursuant to § 22.1-212.2:3” following “educational technology,” and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 22.1-212.2:3.
Repealed by Acts 2011, c. 216, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-212.2:3, which established the Family Involvement in Technology (FIT) program, was derived from Acts 1999, c. 456.